src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-25sueaeq_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - süä: # Noun (25) süä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     süä+N+Sg+Nom: süä
     süä+N+Sg+Gen: süäme
     süä+N+Sg+Par: süänd
     süä+N+Sg+Ill: süämehe
     süä+N+Sg+Ine: süämen
     süä+N+Sg+Ela: süämest
     süä+N+Sg+All: süämele
     süä+N+Sg+Ade: süämel
     süä+N+Sg+Abl: süämelt
     süä+N+Sg+Tra: süämes
     süä+N+Sg+Ter: süämeniq
     süä+N+Sg+Abe: süämeldäq
     süä+N+Sg+Com: süämegaq
     süä+N+Pl+Nom: süämeq
     süä+N+Pl+Gen: süämide
     süä+N+Pl+Par: süämit
     süä+N+Pl+Ill: süämihe
     süä+N+Pl+Ine: süämin
     süä+N+Pl+Ela: süämist
     süä+N+Pl+All: süämile
     süä+N+Pl+Ade: süämil
     süä+N+Pl+Abl: süämilt
     süä+N+Pl+Tra: süämis
     süä+N+Pl+Ter: süäminiq
     süä+N+Pl+Abe: süämildäq
     süä+N+Pl+Com: süämidegaq
